Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.820

Inspection or grading of commodities—Unloading commodity without inspection or weighing.

When commodities are shipped to points where inspection is provided and the bill of lading does not contain the notation "not for terminal weight and grade" and the commodity is unloaded by or on account of the consignee or his or her assignee without being inspected or weighed by a duly authorized inspector under the provisions of this chapter, the shipper's weight and grade shall be conclusive and final and shall be the weight and grade upon which settlement shall be made with the seller, and the consignee or his or her assignee, by whom such commodities are so unlawfully unloaded shall be liable to the seller thereof for liquidated damages in an amount equal to ten percent of the sale price of such commodities computed on the basis of the shipper's weight and grade.

[ 2011 c 336 s 648; 1963 c 124 s 49. Formerly RCW 22.09.490.]